Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB264.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 5(b)(1) of the act of December 1, 1977 (P.L.237, No.76), known as the Local Economic Revitalization Tax Assistance Act, is amended to read:Section 5. Exemption schedule.* * *(b) Whether or not the assessment eligible for exemption is based upon actual cost or a maximum cost, the actual amount of taxes exempted shall be in accordance with the schedule of taxes exempted established by a local taxing authority subject to the following limitations:(1) The length of the schedule of taxes exempted shall 123456789101112131415161718192021 not exceed [ten] 20 years.* * *Section 2. This act shall apply to applications for tax exemptions submitted after the effective date of this section.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0264PN0216 - 2 - 12345